Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2992.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Child sexual abuse and assault awareness and prevention pilot program; contract; provider; curriculum development; parental exemption; reporting requirements; delayed repeal; definitions A. The child sexual abuse and assault awareness and prevention pilot program is established in the department of education. On or before July 1, 2027, the department shall select six public schools to participate in the pilot program during the 2027-2028 school year.  The department of education shall consult with the department of child safety and organizations that are operated by survivors of grooming or human trafficking in developing the pilot program established by this subsection and the curriculum developed pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 3 of this section.  The pilot program must include: 1. For teachers, at least four hours of in-person, evidence-based instructional modules that are provided by an organization that is selected pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 2 of this section and that may include the following: (a) Training regarding the prevention and identification of, and responses to, child sexual abuse and assault, including exploitation, grooming, grooming with the intent to exploit and technology-facilitated abuse. (b) Resources to further student, teacher and parental awareness and prevention of child sexual abuse and assault, including exploitation, grooming, grooming with the intent to exploit and technology-facilitated abuse. 2. For students, at least three hours of age-appropriate, in-person, evidence-based instruction provided by an organization that is selected pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 2 of this section and age-appropriate educational materials that are designed for children in kindergarten programs or any of grades one through twelve regarding child sexual abuse and assault awareness and prevention, including exploitation, grooming behaviors and grooming with the intent to exploit. The evidence-based instruction provided pursuant to this paragraph may include instruction in: (a) Skills to recognize the following: (i) Child sexual abuse and assault. (ii) Boundary violations and unwanted forms of contact. (iii) Grooming behaviors, including manipulation, trust building, secrecy, desensitization and isolation. (iv) Exploitation and grooming with the intent to exploit, including online grooming, sextortion and technology-facilitated exploitation. (v) Patterns, tactics and warning signs associated with grooming and exploitation. (b) Strategies that: (i) Promote disclosure. (ii) Reduce self-blame. (iii) Mobilize bystanders. 3. A uniform child sexual abuse and assault response policy and reporting procedure that is based on best practices and that may include: (a) Actions that victims of child sexual abuse and assault may take to obtain assistance. (b) Intervention and counseling options for victims of child sexual abuse and assault. (c) Access to educational resources to enable victims of child sexual abuse and assault to succeed in school. (d) Uniform procedures for reporting instances of child sexual abuse and assault to school staff members. B. The department of education: 1. May contract with a provider to implement the pilot program established by subsection A of this section if the provider demonstrates that the provider is able to meet all of the requirements prescribed by subsection A of this section. 2. Shall select one or more organizations to provide the instructional modules for teachers pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 1 of this section or the instruction for students pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 2 of this section, or both.  The department shall select an organization pursuant to this paragraph only if the organization meets both of the following: (a) Is organized and operated for the purpose of preventing child sexual abuse, promoting grooming awareness or preventing human trafficking. (b) Ensures that the individuals who will provide instruction to teachers and students are either qualified survivors of grooming or human trafficking or advocates who have direct expertise in child sexual abuse, grooming and human trafficking prevention. 3. Beginning on the effective date of this section, shall gather stakeholder input to develop a curriculum for the pilot program, including scheduling stakeholder meetings, subject to the following: (a) The department shall solicit input from representatives of each of the following: (i) The department of child safety. (ii) Organizations that are organized and operated for the purpose of preventing child sexual abuse, grooming or human trafficking. (iii) Survivors of child sexual abuse, grooming and human trafficking. (b) The department shall select an organization to develop the curriculum for the pilot program, coordinate stakeholder input and ensure that the curriculum is survivor-informed, prevention-focused and appropriate for students.  The department shall select an organization that both: (i) Is organized and operated for the purpose of preventing child sexual abuse, grooming or human trafficking. (ii) Demonstrates that the organization has experience providing survivor-informed prevention education. (c) The curriculum developed pursuant to subdivision (b) of this paragraph is subject to approval by the state board of education and the department of education. C. A public school that participates in the pilot program established by subsection A of this section may not require any student to participate in the pilot program. Written notification to the public school from a student's parent or legal guardian is sufficient to exempt the student from participating in the pilot program or from any portion of the pilot program that the parent or legal guardian specifies. D. On or before October 1, 2028, each public school that participates in the pilot program established by subsection A of this section shall submit a report to the department of education and a copy of the report to the department of child safety that includes all of the following: 1. The number of students who received evidence-based instruction through the pilot program, together with the number of hours of instruction that the organization that is selected pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 2 of this section provided. 2. The number of teachers who completed the evidence-based instructional modules provided through the pilot program. 3. Any testimony or comments from teachers, students or the parents of students relating to the pilot program. 4. Whether the school intends to continue providing instructional modules to teachers or instruction to students, or both, through an organization that is selected pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 2 of this section in subsequent school years. E. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Grooming" means a pattern of conduct used to gain a minor's trust, desensitize the minor to inappropriate conduct and facilitate exploitation. 2. "Exploitation" means the manipulation, abuse or use of a minor for sexual purposes, sexual conduct, sexual trafficking, sexual extortion or other sexual abuse. F. This section is repealed from and after December 31, 2028. Sec. 2. Appropriation; department of education; child sexual abuse and assault awareness and prevention pilot program; exemption A. The sum of $100,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of education for the child sexual abuse and assault awareness and prevention pilot program established by this act. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations, until June 30, 2028.